Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-920
Relationship to state laws.

Nothing in sections 44-916 to 44-920 shall preempt or supersede existing state law related to medical records or health or insurance information privacy.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 20.